Vermont, session 2025-2026, H69.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1132 is amended to read:
§ 1132. VACCINE ADVERSE EVENT REPORTING SYSTEM
(a) A health care practitioner administering vaccinations shall report to the
Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System, in consultation with the patient, or,
VT LEG #379048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.69
2025 Page 2 of 3
if a minor, the patient’s parent or guardian, all significant adverse events that
occur after vaccination of adults and children, even if the practitioner is unsure
whether a vaccine caused the adverse event.
(b)(1) Annually, on or before January 15, the Department of Health shall
submit a report to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare and to the
House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services regarding any
adverse reactions reported by health care practitioners in Vermont to the
Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System, including:
(A) the total number of adverse reactions reported during the
previous calendar year;
(B) aggregated reported adverse reactions by immunization type, lot
number, and age of recipient if the size of the data set allows;
(C) total number and cost of emergency department visits related to
reported adverse reactions;
(D) total number of hospitalizations, permanent disabilities, and
deaths related to reported adverse reactions; and
(E) a summary of activities undertaken by the Department to support
Vermonters filing for compensation pursuant to the National Childhood
Vaccine Injury Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 300aa-1 et seq.
VT LEG #379048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.69
2025 Page 3 of 3
(2) The Department shall post the report submitted pursuant to this
subsection on its website and shall provide electronic copies to health care
providers administering immunizations in Vermont.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379048 v.1